Rhode Island, session 2025, SB263.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-95. Acute mental health crisis mobile response and stabilization services.
(a) As used in this section “Mobile response and stabilization services” means a behavioral
health crisis intervention system providing immediate de-escalation, stabilization services, and
follow-up care, provided by a certified provider. These services are delivered to provide rapid
response to, assessment of, and early intervention for a child or youth eighteen (18) years of age
and younger experiencing an acute mental health crisis. Symptoms might include, but are not
limited to:
(1) Aggression;
(2) Self-injury;
(3) Trauma;
(4) Acute depression/anxiety;
(5) Challenges at school; Suicidal or homicidal thoughts/behaviors; and
(6) Extreme parent/child conflict.
Mobile response and stabilization services are provided by “certified providers” meaning
licensed behavioral health organizations providing outpatient services, which have demonstrated
expertise in delivering child-specific mobile response and stabilization services, and have obtained
relevant state licensure or certification.

(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for mobile response and
stabilization services, consistent with the core components of the mobile crisis model, and in
accordance with the insurer’s existing reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting processes,
provided any utilization review processes do not limit timely access or fidelity to the model.
(c) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-87. Acute mental health crisis mobile response and stabilization services.
(a) As used in this section “Mobile response and stabilization services” means a behavioral
health crisis intervention system providing immediate de-escalation, stabilization services, and
follow-up care, provided by a certified provider. These services are delivered to provide rapid
response to, assessment of, and early intervention for a child or youth eighteen (18) years of age
and younger experiencing an acute mental health crisis. Symptoms might include, but are not
limited to:
(1) Aggression;
(2) Self-injury;
(3) Trauma;
(4) Acute depression/anxiety;
(5) Challenges at school; Suicidal or homicidal thoughts/behaviors; and
(6) Extreme parent/child conflict.
Mobile response and stabilization services are provided by “certified providers” meaning
licensed behavioral health organizations providing outpatient services, which have demonstrated
expertise in delivering child-specific mobile response and stabilization services, and have obtained
LC001160/SUB A - Page 2 of 6

relevant state licensure or certification.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for mobile response and
stabilization services, consistent with the core components of the mobile crisis model, and in
accordance with the insurer’s existing reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting processes,
provided any utilization review processes do not limit timely access or fidelity to the model.
(c) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-83. Acute mental health crisis mobile response and stabilization services.
(a) As used in this section “Mobile response and stabilization services” means a behavioral
health crisis intervention system providing immediate de-escalation, stabilization services, and
follow-up care, provided by a certified provider. These services are delivered to provide rapid
response to, assessment of, and early intervention for a child or youth eighteen (18) years of age
and younger experiencing an acute mental health crisis. Symptoms might include, but are not
limited to:
(1) Aggression;
(2) Self-injury;
(3) Trauma;
(4) Acute depression/anxiety;
(5) Challenges at school; Suicidal or homicidal thoughts/behaviors; and
(6) Extreme parent/child conflict.
Mobile response and stabilization services are provided by “certified providers” meaning
licensed behavioral health organizations providing outpatient services, which have demonstrated
LC001160/SUB A - Page 3 of 6

expertise in delivering child-specific mobile response and stabilization services, and have obtained
relevant state licensure or certification.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for mobile response and
stabilization services, consistent with the core components of the mobile crisis model, and in
accordance with the insurer’s existing reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting processes,
provided any utilization review processes do not limit timely access or fidelity to the model.
(c) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-100. Acute mental health crisis mobile response and stabilization services.
(a) As used in this section “Mobile response and stabilization services” means a behavioral
health crisis intervention system providing immediate de-escalation, stabilization services, and
follow-up care, provided by a certified provider. These services are delivered to provide rapid
response to, assessment of, and early intervention for a child or youth eighteen (18) years of age
and younger experiencing an acute mental health crisis. Symptoms might include, but are not
limited to:
(1) Aggression;
(2) Self-injury;
(3) Trauma;
(4) Acute depression/anxiety;
(5) Challenges at school; Suicidal or homicidal thoughts/behaviors; and
(6) Extreme parent/child conflict.
Mobile response and stabilization services are provided by “certified providers” meaning
LC001160/SUB A - Page 4 of 6

licensed behavioral health organizations providing outpatient services, which have demonstrated
expertise in delivering child-specific mobile response and stabilization services, and have obtained
relevant state licensure or certification.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for mobile response and
stabilization services, consistent with the core components of the mobile crisis model, and in
accordance with the insurer’s existing reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting processes,
provided any utilization review processes do not limit timely access or fidelity to the model.
(c) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001160/SUB A
========
LC001160/SUB A - Page 5 of 6